New York, session 2025-2026, A366.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 11-200 of the election law, as 2 amended by chapter 99 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. Every citizen of the United States now residing outside the United 5 States whose last domicile in the United States immediately prior to 6 [his] such citizen's departure from the United States was in the state 7 of New York, shall be entitled to vote from such last domicile, as a 8 special federal voter in all primary, special and general elections for 9 the public offices or party positions of president and vice-president of 10 the United States, United States senator, representative in congress and 11 delegates and alternate delegates to a national convention, provided 12 such citizen, at the time of such departure from the United States, 13 could have met all the present qualifications of this chapter to vote in 14 federal elections from such last domicile, except the qualification with 15 respect to minimum voting age, even though such citizen does not now 16 maintain a place of abode or domicile in the state of New York, and 17 provided further that such citizen does not maintain a place of abode or 18 domicile, is not registered to vote and is not voting in any other 19 election district[,] or state[, territory or possession of the United 20 States] and provided further that such citizen has a valid passport or 21 card of identity and registration issued under the authority of the 22 secretary of state of the United States. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00273-01-5